Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2752XS (5) 91 lh/ko S.F. 559 Section 1. Section 249A.15B, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 249A.15B Speech pathologists and speech language pathologist 3 assistants eligible for payment. 4 1. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 5 17A entitling speech pathologists who are licensed pursuant 6 to chapter 154F , including those certified in independent 7 practice, to payment for speech pathology services provided 8 to recipients of medical assistance, subject to limitations 9 and exclusions the department finds necessary on the basis of 10 federal laws and regulations. 11 2. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 12 17A that permit a speech language pathologist assistant who 13 practices under a speech pathologist licensed pursuant to 14 chapter 154F to be reimbursed for speech language pathology 15 assistant services provided to recipients under the medical 16 assistance program, subject to limitations and exclusions the 17 department finds necessary on the basis of federal laws and 18 regulations. 19 Sec. 2. MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ââ SPEECH LANGUAGE 20 PATHOLOGIST ASSISTANTS. The department of health and human 21 services shall submit any federal waiver or amendment to the 22 centers for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States 23 department of health and human services to include speech 24 language pathologist assistants who practice under a licensed 25 speech pathologist to participate as a provider under the 26 medical assistance program. 27 Sec. 3. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes 28 effect upon the department of health and human servicesâ 29 receipt of federal approval to allow speech language 30 pathologist assistants to participate as a provider under the 31 medical assistance program: 32 The section of this Act amending section 249A.15B. 33